testing/myv-tests-N-psaka-1.yaml
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: псакавтомонзотнесэ
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: псакавтомонзотнесэ
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: псакавтомонзотнестэ
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: псакавтомонзотнестэ
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: псакавтомонзотнес
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: псакавтомонзотнес
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def: псакавтомонзотнева
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def: псакавтомонзотнева
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакавтомонзотнекс
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакавтомонзотнекс
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: псакавтомонзотнев
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: псакавтомонзотнев
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: псакавтомонзотневтеме
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: псакавтомонзотневтеме
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: псакавтомонзотнешка
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: псакавтомонзотнешка
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: псакавтомонзотненек
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: псакавтомонзотненек
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: псакашканзодо
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef: псакашканзодо
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: псакашканзодо
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef: псакашканзодо
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: псакашканзокс
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef: псакашканзокс
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: псакашканзокс
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef: псакашканзокс
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: псакашканзось
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: псакашканзось
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: псакашканзонть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: псакашканзонть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def: псакашканзонтень
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def: псакашканзонтень
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: псакашканзодонть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: псакашканзодонть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псакашканзосонть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псакашканзосонть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псакашканзостонть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псакашканзостонть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псакашканзованть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псакашканзованть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: псакашканзовтомонть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: псакашканзовтомонть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: псакашканзошканть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: псакашканзошканть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакашканзоксонть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакашканзоксонть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псакашканзотне
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псакашканзотне
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псакашканзотнень
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псакашканзотнень
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def: псакашканзотненень
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def: псакашканзотненень
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: псакашканзотнеде
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: псакашканзотнеде
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: псакашканзотнесэ
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: псакашканзотнесэ
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: псакашканзотнестэ
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: псакашканзотнестэ
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: псакашканзотнес
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: псакашканзотнес
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def: псакашканзотнева
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def: псакашканзотнева
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакашканзотнекс
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакашканзотнекс
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: псакашканзотнев
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: псакашканзотнев
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: псакашканзотневтеме
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: псакашканзотневтеме
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: псакашканзотнешка
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: псакашканзотнешка
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: псакашканзотненек
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: псакашканзотненек
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: псакашканзодо
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef: псакашканзодо
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: псакашканзодо
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef: псакашканзодо
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: псакашканзокс
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef: псакашканзокс
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: псакашканзокс
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef: псакашканзокс
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: псакашканзось
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: псакашканзось
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: псакашканзонть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: псакашканзонть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def: псакашканзонтень
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def: псакашканзонтень
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: псакашканзодонть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: псакашканзодонть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псакашканзосонть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псакашканзосонть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псакашканзостонть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псакашканзостонть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псакашканзованть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псакашканзованть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакашканзоксонть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакашканзоксонть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: псакашканзошканть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: псакашканзошканть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакашканзоксонть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакашканзоксонть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псакашканзотне
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псакашканзотне
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псакашканзотнень
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псакашканзотнень
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def: псакашканзотненень
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def: псакашканзотненень
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: псакашканзотнеде
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: псакашканзотнеде
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: псакашканзотнесэ
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: псакашканзотнесэ
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: псакашканзотнестэ
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: псакашканзотнестэ
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: псакашканзотнес
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: псакашканзотнес
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def: псакашканзотнева
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def: псакашканзотнева
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакашканзотнекс
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакашканзотнекс
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: псакашканзотнев
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: псакашканзотнев
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: псакашканзотневтеме
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: псакашканзотневтеме
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: псакашканзотнешка
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: псакашканзотнешка
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: псакашканзотненек
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: псакашканзотненек
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: псакасонзодо
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef: псакасонзодо
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: псакасонзодо
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef: псакасонзодо
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: псакасонзокс
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef: псакасонзокс
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: псакасонзокс
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef: псакасонзокс
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: псакасонзось
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: псакасонзось
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: псакасонзонть
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: псакасонзонть
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def: псакасонзонтень
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def: псакасонзонтень
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: псакасонзодонть
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: псакасонзодонть
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псакасонзосонть
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псакасонзосонть
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псакасонзостонть
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псакасонзостонть
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псакасонзованть
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псакасонзованть
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакасонзоксонть
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакасонзоксонть
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: псакасонзошканть
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: псакасонзошканть
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакасонзоксонть
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакасонзоксонть
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псакасонзотне
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псакасонзотне
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псакасонзотнень
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псакасонзотнень
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def: псакасонзотненень
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def: псакасонзотненень
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: псакасонзотнеде
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: псакасонзотнеде
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: псакасонзотнесэ
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: псакасонзотнесэ
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: псакасонзотнестэ
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: псакасонзотнестэ
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: псакасонзотнес
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: псакасонзотнес
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def: псакасонзотнева
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def: псакасонзотнева
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакасонзотнекс
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакасонзотнекс
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: псакасонзотнев
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: псакасонзотнев
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: псакасонзотневтеме
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: псакасонзотневтеме
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: псакасонзотнешка
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: псакасонзотнешка
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: псакасонзотненек
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: псакасонзотненек
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: псакастонзодо
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef: псакастонзодо
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: псакастонзодо
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef: псакастонзодо
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: псакастонзокс
